Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 1. State and Local Funds.
§ 22.1-98.2.
Certain agreements; adjustment of state share for basic aid.

Any school board of a school division in which fewer than 1,100 students were included in average daily membership for the preceding school year, in a locality that has a local composite index of .6000 or greater, and has 65 percent or more of its local taxes coming from real estate taxes, as calculated by the Auditor of Public Accounts and reported annually to the Department, upon entering into certain cost-savings agreements with a contiguous school division for the consolidation or sharing of educational, administrative, or support services, shall receive the state share for basic aid computed on the basis of the composite index of local ability-to-pay of the contiguous school division, calculated annually.

The Board shall develop eligibility criteria for such cost-savings and service-sharing agreements and for the adjustment of the state share for basic aid, consistent with the appropriation act.

The Governor shall approve the adjustment to the state share prior to the disbursement of funds. The Department shall annually report to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations and Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations the cost-savings agreements made and the adjusted state shares so approved.

The local school board receiving the adjusted state share shall not use the additional funds received to supplant local funds appropriated for education. The adjusted state share shall be used solely for educational purposes and shall not be used to reduce local operating expenditures for public education from the prior fiscal year. However, no school division shall be required to maintain a per pupil expenditure for operations that exceeds the per pupil expenditure in the prior fiscal year. The superintendent of the school division shall inform the Superintendent of the public education purpose for which these local funds shall be used.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the Commonwealth from terminating or modifying any program or function under which distribution to a local school board has been made, and if so terminated or modified all obligations hereunder shall cease or be reduced in proportion with such modifications, as the case may be.

Except as provided in subsection C, such contractual agreements shall remain in effect until terminated by the relevant school divisions. If any such contractual agreements between the relevant school divisions terminate, the Commonwealth’s obligation under this section shall cease.

This agreement and adjusted state payment shall be in lieu of any existing funds a locality receives from a Small School Division Assistance grant.

History.

2004, c. 820; 2008, cc. 589, 705; 2019, cc. 405, 406; 2022, c. 355.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 820, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2008, cc. 589 and 705, cl. 2 provides: “Nothing in this act shall affect the eligibility of any school board that is currently receiving additional funds pursuant to § 22.1-98.2 of the Code of Virginia as of June 30, 2008, to continue receiving such funds on the same basis as prior to the effective date of this act.”

Acts 2008, cc. 589 and 705, cl. 3 provides: “That additional funds to a school board as a result of this Act shall not be paid unless there is a specific appropriation for such additional funds in the appropriation act at the time payment is proposed, and in no event shall any payments be made prior to July 1, 2010, or will the sum of the basic aid payment and the supplemental basic aid payment exceed the basic aid payment that the locality received pursuant to Chapter 847 of the Acts of Assembly of 2007.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance.” March 10, 2021.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 589 and 705 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “1,110 students” for “350 students” and inserted “in a locality that has a local composite index of .6000 or greater, and has 65 percent or more of its local taxes coming from real estate taxes, as calculated by the Auditor of Public Accounts and reported annually to the Department of Education” in the first sentence.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 405 and 406 are identical, and in subsection A, deleted “for a period of 15 years” at the end of the first paragraph, and in the third paragraph, substituted “House Committee on Appropriations and Senate Committee on Finance” for “House Appropriations and Senate Finance Committees”; in subsection C, substituted “Nothing in this section shall” for “This section shall not”; and in subsection D, inserted the first sentence, and deleted “prior to the end of the applicable period set forth above” following “terminate” in the second sentence.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 in subsection A, deleted “of Education” following “Department” and “Board” throughout; deleted “of Public Instruction” following “Superintendent”; and deleted former subsection F, which read: “Any standard of quality set forth in this act that is not required as of June 30, 2004, and for which additional state funding is required, shall not take effect unless the state’s share of funding that standard is included in the general appropriation act for the period July 1, 2004, through June 30, 2006, passed during the 2004 Session of the General Assembly and signed into law by the Governor.”

§ 22.1-99.
Approval and certification of apportionment of school funds.

Subject to approval or amendment by the Board of Education, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall apportion the state funds appropriated for public school purposes among the several school divisions and, when approved, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall certify to the Comptroller such apportionment for the payment of the same.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-140; 1972, c. 663; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-100.
Unexpended school and educational funds.

All sums of money derived from the Commonwealth which are unexpended in any year in any school division shall revert to the fund of the Commonwealth from which derived unless the Board of Education directs otherwise. All sums derived from local funds unexpended in any year shall remain a part of the funds of the governing body appropriating the funds for use the next year, but no local funds shall be subject to redivision outside of the locality in which they were raised.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-138; 1956, Ex. Sess., c. 67; 1980, c. 559.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Malfeasance. —

School board was not subject to any civil cause of action based on malfeasance because the statute had not been violated. Cty. of Lancaster v. Latimore, 97 Va. Cir. 401, 2013 Va. Cir. LEXIS 228 (Lancaster County May 31, 2013).

School board has right to bring legal proceedings. —

County did not have a cause of action against school officials and a school board based on any alleged action under the statutory scheme being malfeasance in office because the statutory scheme gave the school board the right to bring legal proceedings to challenge any irregularity in the acts of an officer or employee but gave no such right to the county. Cty. of Lancaster v. Latimore, 97 Va. Cir. 401, 2013 Va. Cir. LEXIS 228 (Lancaster County May 31, 2013).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Regional schools surplus funds. —

There are no legal requirements concerning disposition of surplus funds by joint or regional schools organized pursuant to § 22.1-26. The governing board of each such school may adopt bylaws or rules of operation concerning such disposition, so long as the bylaws or rules are not inconsistent with applicable statutes or regulations.
See opinion of Attorney General to Walter C. Erwin, III, Esquire, Lynchburg City Attorney, No. 15-004, 2015 Va. AG LEXIS 24 (9/4/15).

Unexpended funds. —

Funds contributed by members of local public schools’ Section 125 Flexible Benefits Plan are not “local funds” that are subject to return to the city under §
22.1-100 if not expended during the year. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable L. Louise Lucas, Member, Senate of Virginia, 20-022, 2020 Va. AG LEXIS 38 (12/11/20).

Special school tax. —

Special school tax can only be used to pay for capital expenditures, indebtedness or rent, therefore unspent special school tax funds can only be reappropriated to the school board for such purposes. See opinion of Attorney General to Michelle R. Robl, County Attorney, Prince William County, 20-029, 2021 Va. AG LEXIS 19 (5/14/21).

§ 22.1-100.1.
Lottery proceeds nonrecurring costs escrow accounts.

Notwithstanding the provisions of § 22.1-100, the governing body of any locality may authorize the local treasurer or fiscal officer, by ordinance or resolution, to create a separate escrow account upon the books of the locality for the deposit of that portion of the locality’s appropriation from the lottery proceeds which are designated, pursuant to Item 139 B 4 of Chapter 935 of the 1999 Acts of Assembly or any other state law, for nonrecurring costs incurred by the relevant school division.Such nonrecurring costs shall include school construction, additions, infrastructure, site acquisition, renovations, technology, and other expenditures related to modernizing classroom equipment, and debt service payments on school projects completed during the last ten years. Upon adoption of the proper ordinance or resolution, the treasurer or local fiscal officer of the locality shall place such appropriation into a separate lottery proceeds nonrecurring costs escrow account. Under no circumstances shall the escrow account allowed for the school construction grants pursuant to § 22.1-175.5 be used for these deposits.

The escrow account shall be known as the “County/City/Town of _______________ Lottery Proceeds Nonrecurring Costs Fund.” All principal deposited to such fund, together with all income from or attributable to the fund, shall be used solely for (i) construction, additions, renovations, including retrofitting and enlarging public school buildings, infrastructure, including technology infrastructure, and site acquisition for public school buildings and facilities or (ii) debt service payments, or a portion thereof, for any such projects completed in the previous ten years if so designated.No disbursement from the fund may be made except upon specific appropriation by the governing body in accordance with applicable law. If a locality establishes such a fund and designates any portion of the funds deposited therein to pay debt service for (i) any general obligation of the locality held by the Virginia Public School Authority or (ii) any Literary Fund loan, the locality shall obtain an opinion of bond counsel that designation of funds to pay debt service on obligations described in clauses (i) and (ii) hereof does not adversely impact the tax-exempt status of such obligations.

All moneys deposited in the fund, including all income from or attributable to such fund, shall be deemed public funds of the locality and shall be subject to all limitations upon deposit and investment provided by general law, including, but not limited to, the Virginia Security for Public Deposits Act (§

2.2-4400

et seq.). Income, dividends, distributions, and grants accruing to the fund shall be retained in such fund and shall be expended only in accordance with the terms of this section.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed or construed to authorize a school board or school division to receive, hold or invest funds in its own name, or to expend funds in the absence of a specific appropriation by the governing body of the locality in accordance with applicable law.

History.

2000, cc. 635, 693.

§ 22.1-101.
Repealed by Acts 1988, c. 101.

§ 22.1-101.1.
Increase of funds for certain nonresident students; how increase computed and paid; billing of out-of-state placing agencies or persons.

To the extent such funds are appropriated by the General Assembly, a school division shall be reimbursed for the cost of educating a child who is not a child with disabilities and who is not a resident of such school division under the following conditions:

When such child has been placed in foster care or other custodial care within the geographical boundaries of the school division by a Virginia agency, whether state or local, which is authorized under the laws of this Commonwealth to place children;

When such child has been placed within the geographical boundaries of the school division in an orphanage or children’s home which exercises legal guardianship rights; or

When such child, who is a resident of Virginia, has been placed, not solely for school purposes, in a child-caring institution or group home licensed under the provisions of Chapter 17 (§

63.2-1700

et seq.) of Title 63.2 which is located within the geographical boundaries of the school division.

To the extent such funds are appropriated by the General Assembly, a school division shall be reimbursed for the cost of educating a child with disabilities who is not a resident of such school division under the following conditions:

When the child with disabilities has been placed in foster care or other custodial care within the geographical boundaries of the school division by a Virginia agency, whether state or local, which is authorized under the laws of this Commonwealth to place children;

When such child with disabilities has been placed within the geographical boundaries of the school division in an orphanage or children’s home which exercises legal guardianship rights; or

When such child with disabilities, who is a resident of Virginia, has been placed, not solely for school purposes, in a child-caring institution or group home licensed under the provisions of Chapter 17 (§

63.2-1700

et seq.) of Title 63.2 which is located within the geographical boundaries of the school division.

Each school division shall keep an accurate record of the number of days which any child, identified in subsection A or B above, was enrolled in its public schools, the required local expenditure per child, the handicapping condition, if applicable, the placing agency or person and the jurisdiction from which the child was sent. Each school division shall certify this information to the Board of Education by July 1 following the end of the school year in order to receive proper reimbursement. No school division shall charge tuition to any such child.

When a child who is not a resident of Virginia, whether disabled or not, has been placed by an out-of-state agency or a person who is the resident of another state in foster care or other custodial care or in a child-caring institution or group home licensed under the provisions of Chapter 17 (§

63.2-1700

et seq.) of Title 63.2 located within the geographical boundaries of the school division, the school division shall not be reimbursed for the cost of educating such child from funds appropriated by the General Assembly. The school division in which such child has been enrolled shall bill the sending agency or person for the cost of the education of such child as provided in subsection C of § 22.1-5.The costs of the support and maintenance of the child shall include the cost of the education provided by the school division; therefore, the sending agency or person shall have the financial responsibility for the educational costs for the child pursuant to Article V of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children as set forth in Chapters 10 (§

63.2-1000

et seq.) and 11 (§

63.2-1100

et seq.) of Title 63.2. Upon receiving the bill for the educational costs from the school division, the sending agency or person shall reimburse the billing school division for providing the education of the child. Pursuant to Article III of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, no sending agency or person shall send, bring, or cause to be sent or brought into this Commonwealth any child for placement unless the sending agency or person has complied with this section by honoring the financial responsibility for the educational cost as billed by a local school division.

To the extent that state funds appropriated by the General Assembly pursuant to subsection A or B or other state funds, such as those provided on the basis of average daily membership, do not cover the full cost of educating a child pursuant to this subsection, a school division shall be reimbursed by (i) the school division in which a child’s custodial parent or guardian resides or (ii) in the case of a child who has been placed in the custody of the Department of Social Services, the school division in which the parent or guardian who had custody immediately preceding the placement resides, for any remaining costs of educating such child, whether disabled or not, who has been placed, not solely for school purposes, in (a) foster care or other custodial care within the geographical boundaries of the school division to be reimbursed, or (b) a child-caring institution or group home licensed under the provisions of Chapter 17 (§

63.2-1700

et seq.) of Title 63.2 that is located within the geographical boundaries of the school division to be reimbursed.

History.

1988, c. 101; 1992, cc. 837, 880; 1994, c. 854; 2014, c. 790.

Cross references.

As to enrollment of certain children placed in foster care, see § 22.1-3.4.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1992, cc. 837 and 880, cl. 5, as amended by Acts 1993, cc. 232 and 283, cls. 1 and 2, provide that the amendment to this section by the 1992 acts is effective July 1, 1993.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 790 added subsection E.